North Dakota statutes. TITLE 45 Partnerships
CHAPTER 45-10.2 Uniform Limited Partnership Act

45-10.2-01. (101)
Citation.

This chapter may be cited as the North Dakota Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001).

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

Collateral References.

Conflict of laws as to partnership matters, 29 A.L.R.2d 295.

Liability for false information in certificate of limited partnership, under Uniform Limited Partnership Act § 6, 34 A.L.R.2d 1454.

Partner’s breach of fiduciary duty to copartner on sale of partnership interest to another partner,
4 A.L.R.4th 1122.

Limited partnership: sufficiency of procedure for designating or admitting additional general partner, 6 A.L.R.4th 1277.

Derivative liability of partner for punitive damages for wrongful act of copartner, 14 A.L.R.4th 1335.

Inability of partnership to operate at profit as justification for court-ordered dissolution, 20 A.L.R.4th 122.

Right of limited partner to maintain derivative action on behalf of partnership, 26 A.L.R.4th 264.

Civil liability of one partner to another or to the partnership based on partner’s personal purchase of partnership property during existence of partnership, 37 A.L.R.4th 494.

Liability of limited partner arising from taking part in control of business under uniform limited partnership act, 79 A.L.R.4th 427.

45-10.2-02. (102)
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Address” means:

In the case of a registered office or principal executive office, the mailing address, including the zip code, of the actual office location which may not be only a post-office box; and

In all other cases, the mailing address, including the zip code.

“Authenticated electronic communication” means:

That the electronic communication is delivered:

To the principal place of business of the limited partnership; or

To a general partner or agent of the limited partnership authorized by the limited partnership to receive the electronic communication; and

That the electronic communication sets forth information from which the limited partnership can reasonably conclude that the electronic communication was sent by the purported sender.

“Business” includes every trade, occupation, activity, and profession.

“Certificate of limited partnership” means the certificate referred to in section 45-10.2-23 and the certificate as amended or restated.

“Constituent limited partnership” means a constituent organization that is a limited partnership.

“Constituent organization” means an organization that is party to a merger.

“Contribution”, except in the phrase “right of contribution”, means any benefit provided by a person to a limited partnership:

In order to become a partner; or

In the capacity of the person as a partner.

“Converted organization” means the organization into which a converting organization converts pursuant to sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-99.

“Converting limited partnership” means a converting organization that is a limited partnership.

“Converting organization” means an organization that converts into another organization pursuant to section 45-10.2-94.

“Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person that is the subject of:

An order of relief under title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

“Distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a limited partnership to a partner or to the transferee of the partner on account of a transferable interest owned by the transferee.

“Domestic organization” means an organization created under the laws of this state.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic communication” means any form of communication not directly involving the physical transmission of paper:

That creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient of the communication; and

That may be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process.

“Electronic record” means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and signed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

“Filed with the secretary of state” means except as otherwise permitted by law or rule:

That a record meeting the applicable requirements of this chapter together with the fees provided in section 45-10.2-109 was delivered or communicated to the secretary of state by a method or medium of communication acceptable by the secretary of state and was determined by the secretary of state to conform to law.

That the secretary of state did then:

Record the actual date on which the record was filed, and if different, the effective date of filing; and

Record the record in the office of the secretary of state.

“Foreign limited liability limited partnership” means a partnership formed by two or more persons under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this state:

Which is required by those laws to have one or more general partners and one or more limited partners;

Whose general partners have limited liability for the obligations of the foreign limited liability limited partnership under provisions similar to chapter 45-23;

For a purpose for which a limited liability limited partnership may be organized under chapter 45-23; and

Which is in good standing in its jurisdiction of origin.

“Foreign limited partnership” means a partnership formed by two or more persons under laws of a jurisdiction other than this state:

Which is required by those laws to have one or more general partners and one or more limited partners;

Whose general partners have personal liability for the obligations of the foreign limited partnership under provisions similar to this chapter;

For a purpose for which a limited partnership may be organized under this chapter; and

Which is in good standing in its jurisdiction of origin.

“Foreign organization” means an organization created under laws of a jurisdiction other than this state.

“General partner” means:

With respect to a limited partnership, a person:

That becomes a general partner under section 45-10.2-37 and has not become dissociated as a general partner under section 45-10.2-57; or

That was a general partner in a limited partnership when the limited partnership became subject to this chapter under section 45-10.2-03 and has not become dissociated as a general partner under section 45-10.2-57; and

With respect to a foreign limited partnership, a person that has rights, powers, and obligations similar to those of a general partner in a limited partnership.

“Governing statute” means:

With respect to a domestic organization, the following chapters of this code which govern the internal affairs of the organization:

If a corporation, chapter 10-19.1;

If a limited liability company, chapter 10-32.1;

If a general partnership, chapters 45-12 through 45-21;

If a limited partnership, this chapter;

If a limited liability partnership, chapter 45-22; and

If a limited liability limited partnership, chapter 45-23; and

With respect to a foreign organization, the laws of the jurisdiction under which the organization is created and under which the internal affairs of the organization are governed.

“Limited liability limited partnership”, except in the phrase “foreign limited liability limited partnership”, means a partnership that is formed by two or more persons and which has one or more general partners and one or more limited partners:

Which is formed under chapter 45-23; or

Which elects to become subject to chapter 45-23.

“Limited partner” means:

With respect to a limited partnership, a person that:

Becomes a limited partner under section 45-10.2-31 and has not become dissociated as a limited partner under section 45-10.2-55; or

Was a limited partner in a limited partnership when the limited partnership became subject to this chapter under section 45-10.2-03 and has not become dissociated as a limited partner under section 45-10.2-55; and

With respect to a foreign limited partnership, a person that has rights, powers, and obligations similar to those of a limited partner in a limited partnership.

“Limited partnership”, except in the phrases “foreign limited partnership” and “foreign limited liability limited partnership” means a partnership that is formed by two or more persons and which has one or more general partners and one or more limited partners:

Which is formed under this chapter; or

Which elects to become subject to this chapter under section 45-10.2-03.

“Notice”:

Is given to a limited partnership:

When in writing and mailed or delivered to a general partner at the registered office or principal executive office of the limited partnership; or

When given by a form of electronic communication consented to by a general partner of the limited partnership to which the notice is given if by:

Facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which a general partner of the limited partnership has consented to receive notice;

Electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which a general partner of the limited partnership has consented to receive notice;

Posting on an electronic network on which a general partner of the limited partnership has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the limited partnership of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice; or

Any other form of electronic communication by which a general partner of the limited partnership has consented to receive notice, when directed to the limited partnership.

Is given to a partner of the limited partnership:

When in writing and mailed or delivered to the partner at the registered office or principal executive office of the limited partnership; or

When given by a form of electronic communication consented to by the partner to which the notice is given if by:

Facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which the partner has consented to receive notice;

Electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the partner has consented to receive notice;

Posting on an electronic network on which the partner has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the partner of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice; or

Any other form of electronic communication by which the partner has consented to receive notice, when directed to the partner.

Is given in all other cases:

When mailed to the person at an address designated by the person or at the last-known address of the person;

When deposited with a nationally recognized overnight delivery service for overnight delivery or, if overnight delivery to the person is not available, for delivery as promptly as practicable, to the person at an address designated by the person or at the last-known address of the person;

When handed to the person;

When left at the office of the person with a clerk or other person in charge of the office, or:

If there is no one in charge, when left in a conspicuous place in the office; or

If the office is closed or the person to be notified has no office, when left at the dwelling house or usual place of abode of the person with some person of suitable age and discretion then residing there;

When given by a form of electronic communication consented to by the person to whom the notice is given if by:

Facsimile communication, when directed to a telephone number at which the person has consented to receive notice;

Electronic mail, when directed to an electronic mail address at which the person has consented to receive notice;

Posting on an electronic network on which the person has consented to receive notice, together with separate notice to the person of the specific posting, upon the later of:

The posting; or

The giving of the separate notice; or

Any other form of electronic communication, by which the person has consented to receive notice, when directed to the person; or

When the method is fair and reasonable when all circumstances are considered.

Is given when deposited in the United States mail with sufficient postage affixed.

Is given by deposit for delivery when deposited for delivery as provided in paragraph 2 of subdivision c, after having made sufficient arrangements for payment by the sender.

Is deemed received when it is given.

“Organization”:

Means, whether domestic or foreign, a corporation, limited liability company, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, and any other person subject to a governing statute; but

Excludes:

Any nonprofit corporation, whether a domestic nonprofit corporation which is incorporated under chapter 10-33 or a foreign nonprofit corporation which is incorporated under the laws of another jurisdiction; or

Any nonprofit limited liability company, whether a domestic nonprofit limited liability company which is organized under chapter 10-36 or a foreign nonprofit limited liability company which is organized in another jurisdiction.

“Organizational records” means:

For a domestic or foreign general partnership, its partnership agreement;

For a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, its certificate of limited partnership and partnership agreement;

For a domestic or foreign limited liability company, its articles of organization, bylaws or operating agreement, and any member-control agreement, or comparable records as provided in its governing statute;

For a domestic or foreign corporation for profit, its articles of incorporation, bylaws, and other agreements among its shareholders which are authorized by its governing statute, or comparable records as provided in its governing statute; and

For any other organization, the basic records that create the organization and determine its internal governance and the relations among the persons that own it, have an ownership interest in it, or are members of it.

“Ownership interests” means for an organization which is:

A corporation, its shares;

A limited liability company, its membership interests;

A limited partnership, its partnership interests;

A general partnership, its partnership interests;

A limited liability partnership, its partnership interests; or

A limited liability limited partnership, its partnership interests.

“Partner” means a general or limited partner.

“Partnership agreement”:

Means the agreement of the partners, whether oral, implied, in a record, or in any combination, concerning the limited partnership; and

Includes the agreement as amended.

“Partnership interest” means the transferable interest of a partner.

“Person dissociated as a general partner” means a person dissociated as a general partner of a limited partnership.

“Personal liability” means personal liability for a debt, liability, or other obligation of an organization which is imposed on a person that co-owns, has an ownership interest in, or is a member of the organization:

By the governing statute of an organization solely by reason of the person co-owning, having an ownership interest in, or being a member of the organization; or

By the organizational records of an organization under a provision of the governing statute of an organization authorizing those records to make one or more specified persons liable for all or specified debts, liabilities, and other obligations of the organization solely by reason of the person or persons co-owning, having an ownership interest in, or being a member of the organization.

“Principal executive office” means:

An office from which the limited partnership conducts business; or

If the limited partnership has no office from which it conducts business, then the registered office of the limited partnership.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Registered office” means the place in this state designated in the certificate of limited partnership or in the certificate of authority of a foreign limited partnership as the registered office.

“Required information” means the information that a limited partnership is required to maintain under section 45-10.2-13.

“Signed” means:

That the signature of a person, which may be a facsimile affixed, engraved, printed, placed, stamped with indelible ink, transmitted by facsimile or electronically, or in any other manner reproduced on the record, is placed on a record with the present intention to authenticate that record; and

With respect to a record required by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state that:

The record is signed by a person authorized to sign the record by this chapter, by the partnership agreement, or by a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of the required proportion or number of partners; and

The signature and the record are communicated by a method or medium of communication acceptable by the secretary of state.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Surviving organization” means an organization into which one or more other organizations are merged and which:

May pre-exist the merger; or

May be created by the merger.

“Transfer” includes an assignment, conveyance, deed, bill of sale, lease, mortgage, security interest, encumbrance, gift, and transfer by operation of law.

“Transferable interest” means the right of a partner to receive distributions.

“Transferee” means, except in section 45-10.2-45, a person to which all or part of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether or not the transferor is a partner.

“Vote” includes authorization by written action.

“Written action” means:

A written record signed by all of the persons required to take the action; and

The counterparts of a written record signed by any of the persons taking the action described.

Each counterpart constitutes the action of the person signing; and

All the counterparts, taken together, constitute one written action by all of the persons signing the counterparts.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 101, § 68; 2007, ch. 354, § 24; 2009, ch. 106, § 60; 2015, ch. 87, § 26, effective July 1, 2015.

45-10.2-03. (1206)
Application to existing relationships.

After June 30, 2005, no person may use chapter 45-10.1 to form an entity.

Before January 1, 2006, this chapter governs only:

A limited partnership formed after June 30, 2005; and

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a limited partnership formed under chapter 45-10.1 which elects, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be subject to this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, on and after January 1, 2006, this chapter governs:

Any limited partnership formed under chapter 45-10.1 which has not previously elected to be governed by this chapter and is still in existence on January 1, 2006; and

All limited partnerships, including each limited partnership formed under chapter 45-10.1 which has previously elected to become governed by this chapter.

With respect to a limited partnership formed before July 1, 2005, the following rules apply except as the partners otherwise elect in the manner provided in the partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement:

Subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-07 does not apply and the limited partnership has whatever duration it had under the law applicable immediately before the limited partnership became subject to this chapter;

Sections 45-10.2-55 and 45-10.2-56 do not apply and a limited partner has the same right and power to dissociate from the limited partnership, with the same consequences, as existed immediately before the limited partnership became subject to this chapter;

Subsection 4 of section 45-10.2-57 does not apply;

Subsection 5 of section 45-10.2-57 does not apply and a court has the same power to expel a general partner as the court had immediately before the limited partnership became subject to this chapter; and

Subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-66 does not apply and the connection between the dissociation of a person as a general partner and the dissolution of the limited partnership is the same as existed immediately before the limited partnership became subject to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-04. (1207)
Savings clause.

This chapter does not affect an action commenced, proceeding brought, or right accrued before this chapter takes effect.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-05.
Legal recognition of electronic records and electronic signatures.

For purposes of this chapter:

A record or signature may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form;

A contract may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because an electronic record was used in its formation;

If a provision requires a record to be in writing, then an electronic record satisfies the requirement;

If a provision requires a signature, then an electronic signature satisfies the requirement; and

The provisions of this chapter relating to electronic records and electronic transactions do not limit or supersede any provision of chapter 9-16.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

Cross-References.

Electronic transactions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 9-16.

45-10.2-06. (103)
Knowledge and notice.

A person knows or has knowledge of a fact if the person has actual knowledge of it. A person does not know or have knowledge of a fact merely because the person has reason to know or have knowledge of the fact.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Knows of the fact;

Has received notice of the fact as provided in subsection 27 of section 45-10.2-02;

Has reason to know the fact exists from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

Has notice of it under subsection 3 or 4.

A certificate of limited partnership on file in the office of the secretary of state is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and the persons designated in the certificate as general partners are general partners. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 9, the certificate is not notice of any other fact.

Subject to subsection 9, a person has notice of:

The dissociation of another person as a general partner ninety days after the effective date of a filed amendment to the certificate of limited partnership which states that the other person has dissociated or ninety days after the effective date of a filed statement of dissociation pertaining to the other person, whichever occurs first;

The dissolution of a limited partnership ninety days after the effective date of a filed amendment to the certificate of limited partnership stating that the limited partnership is dissolved;

The termination of a limited partnership ninety days after the effective date of a filed statement of termination;

The conversion of a limited partnership under sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-99 ninety days after the effective date of the filed articles of conversion; or

A merger under sections 45-10.2-100 through 45-10.2-103 ninety days after the effective date of the filed articles of merger.

A person notifies or gives a notification to another person by taking the steps provided in subsection 27 of section 45-10.2-02, whether or not the other person learns of it.

A person receives a notification as provided in subsection 27 of section 45-10.2-02.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8 and except as otherwise provided in subsection 27 of section 45-10.2-02, a person other than an individual knows, has notice, or receives a notification of a fact for purposes of a particular transaction when the individual conducting the transaction for the person knows, has notice, or receives a notification of the fact, or in any event when the fact would have been brought to the attention of the individual if the person had exercised reasonable diligence.

A person other than an individual exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the individual conducting the transaction for the person and there is reasonable compliance with the routines.

Reasonable diligence does not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the regular duties of the individual or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

Knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the limited partnership by a general partner is effective immediately as knowledge of, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the limited partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the limited partnership committed by or with the consent of the general partner. Knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the limited partnership by a limited partner is not effective as knowledge by, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the limited partnership.

Notice otherwise effective under subsection 4 does not affect the power of a person to transfer real property held in the name of a limited partnership unless at the time of transfer a certified copy of the relevant statement, amendment, or articles, as filed with the secretary of state, has been recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county in which the real property affected by the statement, amendment, or articles is located.

With respect to notice given by a form of electronic communication:

Consent by a partner to notice given by electronic communication may be given in writing or by authenticated electronic communication. The partnership is entitled to rely on any consent so given until revoked by the partner. However, no revocation affects the validity of any notice given before receipt by the partnership of revocation of the consent.

An affidavit of a general partner or an authorized agent of the limited partnership, that the notice has been given by a form of electronic communication is, in the absence of fraud, prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the affidavit.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-06.1.
Reservation of legislative right.

The legislative assembly reserves the right to amend or repeal the provisions of this chapter. A limited partnership formed under or governed by this chapter is subject to this reserved right.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 101, § 69.

45-10.2-07. (104)
Nature, purpose, and duration of entity.

A limited partnership is an entity distinct from its partners.

A limited partnership may be organized under this chapter for any lawful purpose except banking or insurance.

A limited partnership has a perpetual duration unless otherwise provided in its certificate of limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-08. (105)
General powers.

A limited partnership has the powers to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities, including the power to sue, be sued, and defend in its own name and to maintain an action against a partner for harm caused to the limited partnership by a breach of the partnership agreement or violation of a duty to the partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-09. (106 and 107)
Governing law.

The law of this state governs relations among the partners of a limited partnership and between the partners and the limited partnership and the liability of partners as partners for an obligation of the limited partnership.

Unless displaced by particular provision of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-10.
Limited partnership name. [Contingent effective date – See note]

The name of each limited partnership as set forth in the certificate of limited partnership:

Must be expressed in letters or characters used in the English language as those letters or characters appear in the American standard code for information interchange (ASCII) table.

Must contain without abbreviation the words “limited partnership” or the abbreviation “L.P.” or “LP”, either of which abbreviations may be used interchangeably for all purposes authorized by this chapter, including real estate matters, contracts, and filings with the secretary of state.

May contain the name of a partner.

May not contain the word “corporation”, “company”, “incorporated”, “limited liability company”, “limited liability partnership”, “limited liability limited partnership”, or an abbreviation of these words.

May not contain a word or phrase indicating or implying the limited partnership:

Is organized for a purpose other than:

A lawful purpose for which a limited partnership may be organized under this chapter; or

For a purpose stated in its certificate of limited partnership; or

May not be organized under this chapter.

Must be distinguishable in the records of the secretary of state from:

The name, whether foreign and authorized to do business in this state or domestic, unless there is filed with the certificate of limited partnership a record in compliance with subsection 3, of:

Another limited partnership;

A corporation;

A limited liability company;

A limited liability partnership; or

A limited liability limited partnership;

A name the right to which is, at the time of the filing of the certificate of limited partnership, reserved in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-14, 10-32.1-12, 10-33-11, 45-10.2-11, 45-13-04.2, or 45-22-05;

A fictitious name registered in the manner provided in chapter 45-11;

A trade name registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-25; or

A trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

The secretary of state shall determine whether a limited partnership name is distinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter and may adopt rules reasonable or necessary for making these determinations.

If the secretary of state determines a limited partnership name is indistinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter, the limited partnership name may not be used unless there is filed with the articles:

The written consent of the holder of the registered trade name or the holder of the rights to the name to which the proposed name has been determined to be indistinguishable; or

A certified copy of a judgment of a court in this state establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state.

Subsection 3 does not affect the right of a limited partnership existing on the effective date of this chapter, or a foreign limited partnership authorized to do business in this state on that date, to continue the use of its name.

This section and section 45-10.2-11 do not:

Abrogate or limit:

The law of unfair competition or unfair practices;

Chapter 47-25;

The laws of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect copyrights, trade names, trademarks, service names, and service marks; or

Any other right to the exclusive use of names or symbols; or

Derogate the common law or the principles of equity.

A limited partnership that is the surviving organization in a merger with one or more organizations, or that acquires by sale, lease, or other disposition to or exchange with an organization all or substantially all of the assets of another organization including its name, may include in its name, subject to the requirements of subsection 1, the name of any of the organizations, if the other organization whose name is sought to be used:

Was incorporated, organized, formed, or registered under the laws of this state;

Is authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state;

Holds a reserved name in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-14, 10-32.1-12, 10-33-11, 45-10.2-11, 45-13-04.2, or 45-22-05;

Holds a fictitious name registered in the manner provided in chapter 45-11;

Holds a trade name registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-25; or

Holds a trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

The use of a name by a limited partnership in violation of this section does not affect or vitiate its limited partnership existence. However, a court in this state may, upon application of the state or of an interested or affected person, enjoin the limited partnership from doing business under a name assumed in violation of this section, although its certificate of limited partnership may have been filed with the secretary of state.

A limited partnership whose period of existence has expired or that is involuntarily dissolved by the secretary of state as provided in section 45-10.2-108 or 45-10.2-108.1 may reacquire the right to use that name by refiling a certificate of limited partnership pursuant to section 45-10.2-23 unless the name has been adopted for use or reserved by another person, in which case the filing will be rejected unless the filing is accompanied by a written consent or judgment pursuant to subsection 3. A limited partnership that cannot reacquire the use of its limited partnership name shall adopt a new limited partnership name that complies with this section by refiling a certificate of limited partnership as provided in section 45-10.2-23; by amending its certificate of limited partnership as provided in section 45-10.2-24; or by reinstating the limited partnership pursuant to section 45-10.2-108. If the new limited partnership name has been adopted for use or reserved by another person, the filing will be rejected unless the filing is accompanied by a written consent or judgment as provided in subsection 3.

Subject to section 45-10.2-78, this section applies to a foreign limited partnership transacting business in this state, having a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, or applying for a certificate of authority.

A limited partnership filing its certificate of limited partnership with an effective date later than the date of filing as provided in subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-27 shall maintain the right to the name until the effective date.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2011, ch. 87, § 63; contingently amended by 2015, ch. 87, §§
27, 28, effective July 1, 2015; contingently amended by 2019, ch. 93, § 9.

Note.

This section is effective upon receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the secretary of state attesting that all necessary administrative rules and information technology components and systems are ready for implementation of this Act.

45-10.2-11.
Reserved name.

The exclusive right to the use of a limited partnership name otherwise permitted by section 45-10.2-10 may be reserved by any person.

The reservation must be made by filing with the secretary of state a request that the name be reserved.

If the name is available for use by the applicant, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of twelve months.

The reservation may be renewed for successive twelve-month periods.

The right to the exclusive use of a limited partnership name reserved pursuant to this section may be transferred to another person by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing in the office of the secretary of state a notice of transfer, and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

The right to the exclusive use of a limited partnership name reserved pursuant to this section may be canceled by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of cancellation.

The secretary of state may destroy all reserved name requests and the index thereof one year after expiration.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-12. (110)
Effect of partnership agreement and nonwaivable provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the partnership agreement governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership. To the extent the partnership agreement does not otherwise provide, this chapter governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

A partnership agreement may not:

Vary the power of a limited partnership under section 45-10.2-08 to sue, be sued, and defend in its own name;

Vary the law applicable to a limited partnership under section 45-10.2-09;

Vary the requirements of section 45-10.2-25;

Vary the information required under section 45-10.2-13 or unreasonably restrict the right to information under section 45-10.2-34 or 45-10.2-43, but the partnership agreement may impose reasonable restrictions on the availability and use of information obtained under those sections and may define appropriate remedies, including liquidated damages, for a breach of any reasonable restrictions on use;

Eliminate the duty of loyalty under section 45-10.2-44, but the partnership agreement may:

Identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty, if not manifestly unreasonable; and

Specify the number or percentage of partners which may authorize or ratify, after full disclosure to all partners of all material facts, a specific act or transaction that otherwise would violate the duty of loyalty;

Unreasonably reduce the duty of care under subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-44;

Eliminate the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-35 and subsection 4 of section 45-10.2-44, but the partnership agreement may prescribe the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured, if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable;

Vary the power of a person to dissociate as a general partner under subsection 1 of section 45-10.2-58 except to require that the notice under subsection 1 of section 45-10.2-57 be in a record;

Vary the power of a court to decree dissolution in the circumstances specified in section 45-10.2-67;

Vary the requirement to wind up the business of a partnership as specified in section 45-10.2-68;

Unreasonably restrict the right to maintain an action under sections 45-10.2-89 through 45-10.2-93;

Restrict the right of a partner under subsection 1 of section 45-10.2-104 to approve a conversion or merger;

Restrict the right of a general partner under subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-104 to consent to an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership which converts the limited partnership to a limited liability limited partnership; or

Restrict rights under this chapter of a person other than a partner or a transferee.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.